District of Columbia statutes.
31-5101

Short title; applicability of provisions.

(a)

This chapter regulating credit life insurance and credit accident and health insurance in the District of Columbia may be cited as “The Act for the Regulation of Credit Life Insurance and Credit Accident and Health Insurance.”

(b)

All life insurance and all accident and health insurance in connection with loans or other credit transactions of less than 5 years duration in the District of Columbia shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter. Such insurance written in connection with a loan or other credit transaction of 5 years duration or more shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter, nor shall such insurance be subject to the provisions of this chapter if the issuance of the insurance is an isolated transaction on the part of the insurer not related to a plan or regular course of conduct for insuring debtors of the creditor.

(c)

Repealed.

Sept. 25, 1962, 76 Stat. 580, Pub. L. 87-686, § 1
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 1411(b)(1), 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(a)
1981 Ed., § 35-1001.
1973 Ed., § 35-1601.
D.C. Law 13-263 added subsec. (c).
D.C. Law 14-132 repealed subsec. (c) which had read:
“(c) Sections §§ 31-5110.01, 31-5111, and 31-5112 shall apply to an insurance plan or program for which an application of approval has been submitted to the Commissioner under § 42-836.01(2)(B).”
D.C. Law 15-105 purported to amend subsec. (c) which was repealed by D.C. Law 14-132, therefore, the amendment was ineffective.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.